ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 3D 프린터 부대용품: 3D 프린터 접착제; 3D 프린터 운반 케이스; 3D 프린터 청소 키트; 3D 프린터 인클로저; 빌드 테이프; 압출기; 필라멘트 건조기; 필라멘트; 노즐; 프린트 베드; 수지
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > 3D spausdintuvų priedai: 3D spausdintuvo klijai; 3D spausdintuvų nešiojimo dėklai; 3D spausdintuvų valymo rinkiniai; 3D spausdintuvo korpusai; Lipni juosta; Ekstruderiai; Gijų džiovintuvai; Gijos; Purkštukai; Spausdinimo padėklai; Dervos
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для 3D-принтеров: Клеящие составы для 3D-печати; Кейсы для 3D-принтеров; Наборы для очистки 3D-принтеров; Корпуса для 3D-принтеров; Подложки для 3D-принтеров; Экструдеры; Сушильные машины для филамента; Пластиковые нити; Сопла; Платформы для 3D-принтеров; Смолы
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para impresoras 3D: Adhesivos de impresora 3D; Estuches de transporte para impresoras 3D; Kits de limpieza para impresoras 3D; Gabinetes de impresora 3D; Cinta de construcción; Extrusoras; Secadores de filamento; Filamentos; Boquillas; Camas de impresión; Resinas
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 3D 印表機配件: 3D 印表機黏著劑; 3D 印表機攜帶箱; 3D 印表機清潔工具包; 3D 印表機外殼; 3D 列印膠帶; 擠出機; 細絲乾燥器; 3D 列印線材; 噴嘴; 3D 印表機底板; 樹脂
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante 3D: Adezivi pentru imprimante 3D; Cutii de transport pentru imprimante 3D; Seturi de curățare pentru imprimante 3D; Incinte pentru imprimante 3D; Bandă construcție; Extrudere; Uscătoare de filament; Filamente; Duze; Suprafețe de imprimare; Rășini
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 3D 打印机配件: 3D 打印机粘合剂; 3D 打印机便携包; 3D 打印机清洁套件; 3D 打印机封闭箱; 成型胶带; 挤出机; 耗材干燥机; 细丝; 接管; 打印床; 树脂
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör för 3D-skrivare: 3D-skrivarlim; Bärväskor för 3D-skrivare; Rengöringsenheter för 3D-skrivare; 3D-skrivarhöljen; Byggtejp; Extruderare; Filamenttorkar; Filament; Munstycken; Utskriftsmattor; Hartser
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > 3D-tulostimen lisätarvikkeet: 3D-tulostimen tarttuvuusaine; 3D-tulostimen kantokotelot; 3D-tulostimen puhdistussarjat; 3D-tulostimen kotelo; Alustateippi; Ekstruuderit; Filamenttikuivain; Filamentit; Suuttimet; Tulostusalustat; Hartsit
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in 3D: Chất kết dính máy in 3D; Hộp đựng máy in 3D; Bộ dụng cụ vệ sinh máy in 3D; Vỏ bảo vệ máy in 3D; Băng xây dựng; Máy đùn; Máy sấy filament; Sợi in; Vòi; Nền in; Nhựa resin
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > 3D-skrivertilbehør: Lim til 3D-printere; Bærevesker til 3D-skrivere; Rengjøringssett til 3D-skrivere; Kabinetter til 3D-skrivere; Byggetape; Ekstrudere; Filamenttørkere; Filamenter; Dyser; Skriversenger; Harpikser
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes 3D: Adhésifs pour imprimante 3D; Mallettes de transport pour imprimante 3D; Kits de nettoyage pour imprimante 3D; Boîtiers pour imprimante 3D; Ruban de construction; Extrudeuses; Sécheurs de filament; Filaments; Buses; Plateaux d’impression; Résines
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til 3D-printere: 3D-printer – klæbemidler; Bæretasker til 3D-printere; Rengøringssæt til 3D-printere; 3D-printer – kabinetter; Byggetape; Ekstrudere; Filamenttørrere; Filamenter; Dyser; Printerplader; Harpikser
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za 3D tiskalnike: Lepila za 3D tiskalnike; Torbice za 3D tiskalnike; Kompleti za čiščenje 3D tiskalnikov; Ohišja za 3D tiskalnike; Lepilo za 3D tiskalnike; Ekstruderji; Sušilniki filamentov; Filamenti; Šobe; Tiskalne plošče; Smole
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > 3D-Drucker-Zubehör: 3D-Drucker-Klebstoffe; Transporttaschen für 3D-Drucker; Reinigungskits für 3D-Drucker; 3D-Drucker-Gehäuse; Bauband; Extruder; Filamenttrockner; Filamente; Düsen; Druckbetten; Harze
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k 3D tiskárnám: Lepidla pro 3D tiskárny; Přenosná pouzdra pro 3D tiskárny; Čistící sady pro 3D tiskárny; Kryty 3D tiskáren; Fólie na tiskovou podložku; Extrudery; Sušičky filamentů; Filamenty; Trysky; Tiskové podložky; Resiny
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за 3D принтер: Лепила за 3D принтер; Калъфи за носене на 3D принтер; Комплекти за почистване на 3D принтер; Корпуси за 3D принтер; Подложки за 3D принтер; Екструдери; Сушилни за филамент; Филаменти; Дюзи; Печатни легла; Смоли
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios para impressoras 3D: Adesivos para impressora 3D; Estojos de transporte para impressora 3D; Kits de limpeza para impressoras 3D; Gabinetes para impressora 3D; Fita de construção; Extrusoras; Secadores de filamento; Filamentos; Bocais; Camas de impressão; Resinas
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > 3D Printer Accessories: 3D Printer Adhesives; 3D Printer Carrying Cases; 3D Printer Cleaning Kits; 3D Printer Enclosures; Build Tape; Extruders; Filament Dryers; Filaments; Nozzles; Print Beds; Resins
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > 3D-nyomtató-kiegészítők: 3D-nyomtató ragasztók; 3D-nyomtató-hordoztó tokok; 3D-nyomtató-tisztítókészletek; 3D-nyomtató burkolatok; Építőszalagok; Extruderek; Filamentszárítók; Filamentumok; Fúvókák; Nyomtatóágyak; Gyanták
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora 3D: Adesivos de impressora 3D; Estojos de transporte para impressora 3D; Kits de limpeza para impressora 3D; Caixas de impressora 3D; Placa de construção; Extrusoras; Secadores de filamento; Filamentos; Bocais; Base de impressão; Resinas
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών 3D: Κολλητικές ουσίες 3D εκτυπωτή; Θήκες μεταφοράς εκτυπωτών 3D; Κιτ καθαρισμού εκτυπωτών 3D; Περιβλήματα 3D εκτυπωτή; Ταινία κατασκευής; Εξωθητήρες; Αφυγραντήρες νήματος; Νήματα εκτύπωσης; Ακροφύσια; Επιφάνειες εκτύπωσης; Ρητίνες
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > 3D Yazıcı Aksesuarları: 3D Yazıcı Yapıştırıcıları; 3D Yazıcı Taşıma Çantaları; 3D Yazıcı Temizleme Setleri; 3D Yazıcı Muhafazaları; Yapı Bandı; Ekstrüderler; Filament Kurutucuları; Filamentler; Hortum Başları; Baskı Yatakları; Reçineler
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k 3D tlačiarňam: Lepidlá pre 3D tlačiarne; Puzdrá na 3D tlačiarne; Súpravy na čistenie 3D tlačiarní; Kryty 3D tlačiarní; Maskovacia páska; Extrudéry; Sušičky filamentov; Filamenty; Trysky; Tlačové podložky; Živice
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ 3D: กาวสำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; กระเป๋าใส่เครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; ชุดทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; ตู้ครอบเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; เทปสร้างสรรค์; เครื่องอัดรีด; เครื่องอบฟิลาเมนต์; เส้นพลาสติก; หัวฉีด; แท่นสำหรับพิมพ์งาน; แบบเรซิน
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor 3D-printers: 3d-printer lijmen; Draagdozen voor 3D-printers; Reinigingskits voor 3D-printers; 3d-printer behuizingen; Bouwtape; Extruders; Filamentdrogers; Filamenten; Mondstukken; Printbedden; Harsen
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do drukarek 3D: Adhezyjne do drukarki 3D; Futerały na drukarki 3D; Zestawy do czyszczenia drukarek 3D; Obudowy drukarek 3D; Taśma; Ekstrudery; Osuszarki filamentów; Filamenty; Dysze; Łoża drukujące; Żywice
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za 3D pisače: Ljepila za 3D pisače; Torbe za 3D pisače; Kompleti za čišćenje 3D pisača; Kućišta za 3D pisače; Traka za izradu; Ekstruderi; Sušilica za filament; Filamenti; Mlaznice; Podloga za ispis; Smole
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > 3Dプリンター関連用品: 3Dプリンター接着剤; 3Dプリンター持ち運び用ケース; 3Dプリンタークリーニングキット; 3Dプリンターエンクロージャー; ビルドテープ; 押出機; フィラメント乾燥機; フィラメント; ノズル; プリントベッド; 樹脂
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti 3D: Adesivi per stampanti 3D; Custodie per stampanti 3D; Kit di pulizia per stampanti 3D; Alloggiamenti per stampanti 3D; Nastro adesivo; Estrusori; Essiccatori per filamenti; Filamenti; Ugelli; Piani di stampa; Resine